test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s13_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - søkja: # 
    søkkja+V+Inf: søkkja
    søkkja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: søkkir
    søkja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: søkti
    søkja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: søktu
    søkja+V+Sup: søkt
    søkja+V+PrfPrc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: søktur
